Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1327.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1839 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 1839. Bribery at Elections.--Any person who shall, directly or indirectly, give or promise or offer to give any gift or reward in money, goods or other valuable thing to any person, with intent to induce him to vote or refrain from voting 12345678910111213141516171819202122 [for any particular candidate or candidates or for or against any constitutional amendment or other question] at any primary or election; or who shall, directly or indirectly, procure for or offer or promise to procure for such person any such gift or reward with the intent aforesaid; or, who with the intent to influence or intimidate such person to give his vote or to refrain from giving his vote for any particular candidate or candidates or for or against any constitutional amendment or other question at any primary or election, shall give to or obtain for or assist in obtaining for or offer or promise to give to or obtain for or assist in obtaining for such person any office, place, appointment or employment, public or private, or threaten such person with dismissal or discharge from any office, place, appointment or employment, public or private, then held by him, shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding fifteen thousand ($15,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than seven (7) years, or both, in the discretion of the court. For the purpose of this section, the term "other valuable thing" includes a chance to win a lottery or similar prize-drawing contest.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1839.1. Payment for Registration.--A person who directly or indirectly gives or promises or offers to give a gift or reward in money, goods or other valuable thing to another person, with the intent to induce the other person to register to vote, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than ten thousand ($10,000) dollars, or to undergo imprisonment of not more than five (5) years, or both, 20250HB1327PN1519 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the discretion of the court. For the purpose of this section, the term "other valuable thing" includes a chance to win a lottery or similar prize-drawing contest.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1327PN1519 - 3 - 1234